North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 2. Expenses of State Officers and State Departments.

§ 147-6.
Expenses paid by warrants; statements filed.

All salaries, purchases of equipment and expenses authorized by law to be paid out of the various funds herebefore mentioned shall be paid by warrant drawn on the State Treasurer. The officer of State or head of any department thereof shall file an itemized statement of the salaries, bills for purchase of equipment and other expenses of his department, and warrants shall be drawn on the State Treasurer for the payment of all salaries, purchases of equipment, and expenses as authorized by law, to be paid by the said officer of State or head of any department thereof, as evidenced by statements so approved and filed. The State Treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to pay said warrants.

History.

1919, c. 117, s. 2; C.S., s. 7630; 1983, c. 913, s. 44.

§ 147-7.
Traveling expenses on State’s business.

When, to efficiently and properly carry into effect and execute any of the duties imposed by his appointment or by the provision of any statute of this State, and provide for the expenses thereof, it is required that any officer of the State or any employee of any department thereof shall travel from place to place, such traveling and other expenses as shall be required shall be approved by said officer or head of the department whose employee incurs such expenses.

History.

1919, c. 117, s. 3; C.S., s. 7631.

§ 147-8.
Mileage allowance to officers or employees using public or private automobiles.

Where it is provided by any law affecting the State of North Carolina, or any subdivision thereof, whereby any employee or officer of the same is allowed to charge mileage for the use of any motor vehicle when owned by the State or any subdivision thereof or by any such employee or officer of the State or any subdivision thereof, when in the discharge of any duties imposed upon him by reason of his employment or office, the same is hereby repealed to the extent that said charge shall be limited to the actual miles traveled by said motor vehicle and no mileage charge shall be allowed for but one occupant of any motor vehicle so used, and provided further that no such mileage charge shall exceed seven cents (7¢) per mile.

History.

1931, c. 382, s. 1; 1953, c. 675, s. 20.

Local Modification.

Guilford: 1961, c. 905; Lee: 1967, c. 58, s. 1; Mecklenburg: 1965, c. 240, s. 1; city of Greensboro: 1959, c. 1137, s. 15.

§ 147-9.
Unlawful to pay more than allowance.

It shall be unlawful for any officer, auditor, bookkeeper, clerk or other employee of the State of North Carolina or any subdivision thereof to knowingly approve any claim or charge on the part of any person for mileage by reason of the use of any motor vehicle owned by the State or any subdivision thereof or by any person and used in the pursuit of his employment or office in excess of seven cents (7¢) per mile as set out in

G.S. 147-8

and any officer, auditor, bookkeeper, clerk or other employee violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1931, c. 382, s. 2; 1953, c. 675, s. 21; 1993, c. 539, s. 1053; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Local Modification.

Lee: 1967, c. 58, s. 2; Mecklenburg: 1965, c. 240, s. 2; city of Greensboro: 1959, c. 1137, s. 16.

§ 147-9.1.
Municipalities and counties exempt.

Nothing in this Article shall be deemed to be applicable to counties or municipalities or to limit or restrict the amount of any automobile mileage allowance, or automobile expense allowance, or any other travel expense allowance or payment which may be paid by a county or municipality or by any board, commission, or other agency of any county or municipality.

History.

1967, c. 941; 1969, c. 180, s. 2.